Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 10. Bilingual-Bicultural Education.

Administrative Code. —

For bilingual-bicultural education, see 4 AAC 34.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 333 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 778 et seq.

Sec. 14.30.400.
Bilingual-bicultural education.

City or borough district school boards and regional educational attendance area boards shall provide a bilingual-bicultural education program for each school in a city or borough school district or regional educational attendance area that is attended by at least eight pupils of limited English-speaking ability and whose primary language is other than English.
A bilingual-bicultural education program shall be provided under a plan of service that has been developed in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.
Nothing in this section precludes a bilingual-bicultural education program from being provided for less than eight pupils in a school.

History.

(§ 26 ch 124 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.30.410.
Bilingual-bicultural education funds.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

The department shall adopt regulations for the determination of entitlement and the distribution of bilingual-bicultural funds to city and borough school districts and regional educational attendance areas.

History.

(§ 26 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 115 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For bilingual-bicultural education, see 4 AAC 34.

Sec. 14.30.420.
Native language education.

A school board shall establish a local Native language curriculum advisory board for each school in the district in which a majority of the students are Alaska Natives and any school district with Alaska Native students may establish a local Native language curriculum advisory board for each school with Alaska Native students in their district. If the local Native language curriculum advisory board recommends the establishment of a Native language education curriculum for a school, the school board may initiate and conduct a Native language education curriculum within grades K through 12 at that school. The program, if established, must include Native languages traditionally spoken in the community in which the school is located. Each school board conducting a program of Native language education shall implement the program as a part of regular classroom studies and shall use

instructors who are certified under AS

14.20.020

or

14.20.025

; and

to the maximum extent possible

instructors and instructional materials available through the University of Alaska; and

audio-visual, computer, and satellite technology.

In this section,

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“Native” means a person of one-fourth degree or more Alaskan Indian, Eskimo, or Aleut blood.

History.

(§ 4 ch 29 SLA 2000)